apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="lík/t__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="skýr/t__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ná/ið__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>ið</l>        <r>ið<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nar</l>       <r>ið<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nast</l>      <r>ið<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="víða__adv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="síða/r__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>r<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>r<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="létt__adv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/harla__adv">
      <e><p><l>fremur</l><r>harla<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>harla</l><r>harla<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fremst</l><r>harla<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sn/öggt__adv">
      <e><p><l>eggra</l><r>öggt<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>öggt</l><r>öggt<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eggst</l><r>öggt<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="svo__cnjadv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="hví__adv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="upp__adv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="mjög__preadv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Interjections -->

    <pardef n="takk__ij">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="takk">            <i>takk</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sko">             <i>sko</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="já">              <i>já</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="vá">              <i>vá</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="takk fyrir">      <i>takk<b/>fyrir</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hvenær">          <i>hvenær</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hví">             <i>hví</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvar">            <i>hvar</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hversu">          <i>hversu</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="af hverju">       <i>af<b/>hverju</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="af hverju"><p><l>afhverju</l>  <r>af<b/>hverju</r></p><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jú">              <i>jú</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="já">              <i>já</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="virkilega">       <i>virkilega</i><par n="mjög__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="í símanum">       <i>í<b/>símanum</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="í gær">           <i>í<b/>gær</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="í dag">           <i>í<b/>dag</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="í morgun">        <i>í<b/>morgun</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="á morgun">        <i>á<b/>morgun</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="algerlega">       <i>algerlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rúmlega">         <i>rúmlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="algjörlega">      <i>algjörlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="auðveldlega">     <i>auðveldlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eflaust">         <i>eflaust</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="einfaldlega">     <i>einfaldlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="endilega">        <i>endilega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fljótlega">       <i>fljótlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="iðulega">         <i>iðulega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jafnvel">         <i>jafnvel</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nákvæmlega">      <i>nákvæmlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nefnilega">       <i>nefnilega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="opinberlega">     <i>opinberlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tæplega">         <i>tæplega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tiltölulega">     <i>tiltölulega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vissulega">       <i>vissulega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="burt">            <i>burt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="afskaplega">      <i>afskaplega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="snögglega">       <i>snögglega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="svolítið">        <i>svolítið</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="enn">             <i>enn</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rétt">            <i>rétt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="einstaklega">     <i>einstaklega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þaðan">           <i>þaðan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neðan">           <i>neðan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bara">            <i>bara</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aðallega">        <i>aðallega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="næsta">           <i>næsta</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="áfram">           <i>áfram</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="auðvitað">        <i>auðvitað</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ennþá">           <i>ennþá</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrr">            <i>fyrr</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gjarnan">         <i>gjarnan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hve">             <i>hve</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="langt">           <i>langt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meira">           <i>meira</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sérstaklega">     <i>sérstaklega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="uppi">            <i>uppi</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þangað">          <i>þangað</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sundur">          <i>sundur</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sáðberandi">      <i>sáðberandi</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stundum">         <i>stundum</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aðeins">          <i>aðeins</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="líka">            <i>líka</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hér">             <i>hér</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="upp">             <i>upp</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bráðum">          <i>bráðum</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="út">              <i>út</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="innan">           <i>innan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þar">             <i>þar</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þegar">           <i>þegar</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fram">            <i>fram</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mjög">            <i>mjög</i><par n="mjög__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="hægt">            <i>hægt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="áður">            <i>áður</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mikið">           <i>mikið</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neikvætt">        <i>neikvætt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að einhverju leyti"><i>að<b/>einhverju<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að mestu leyti">  <i>að<b/>mestu<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að sumu leyti">   <i>að<b/>sumu<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að vissu leyti">  <i>að<b/>vissu<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að því leyti">    <i>að<b/>því<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að öllu leyti">   <i>að<b/>öllu<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="um þetta leyti">  <i>um<b/>þetta<b/>leyti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="að svo miklu leyti sem"><i>að<b/>svo<b/>miklu<b/>leyti<b/>sem</i><par n="svo__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="að því leyti sem"><i>að<b/>því<b/>leyti<b/>sem</i><par n="svo__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="að minnsta kosti" r="LR">  <p><l>a.m.k</l><r>að<b/>minnsta<b/>kosti</r></p><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="um þær mundir">   <i>um<b/>þær<b/>mundir</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="í þann mund að">  <i>í<b/>þann<b/>mund<b/>að</i><par n="svo__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="á ný">            <i>á<b/>ný</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="í raun og veru">  <i>í<b/>raun<b/>og<b/>veru</i><par n="svo__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="í þetta sinn">    <i>í<b/>þetta<b/>sinn</i><par n="svo__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="svo">             <i>svo</i><par n="svo__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="náið">            <i>ná</i><par n="ná/ið__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="skýrt">           <i>skýr</i><par n="skýr/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sterkt">          <i>sterk</i><par n="skýr/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="létt">            <i>létt</i><par n="létt__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="víða">            <i>víða</i><par n="víða__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="síðar">           <i>síða</i><par n="síða/r__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="frekar">          <i>freka</i><par n="síða/r__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="líkt">            <i>lík</i><par n="lík/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="víst">            <i>vís</i><par n="lík/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="samviskusamlega"><i>samviskusamlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stríðnislega"><i>stríðnislega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ákaflega"><i>ákaflega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lítillega"><i>lítillega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mjúklega"><i>mjúklega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ævinlega"><i>ævinlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rækilega"><i>rækilega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="harla"><i></i><par n="/harla__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="varlega"><i>varlega</i><par n="víða__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ósjálfrátt"><i>ósjálfrátt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="snöggt"><i>sn</i><par n="sn/öggt__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vandlega"><i>vandlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nálega"><i>nálega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="augljóslega"><i>augljóslega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="örugglega"><i>örugglega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="augsýnilega"><i>augsýnilega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
